Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.032

Transmission of amounts payable.

The department may, at any time, on receipt of written or electronic authorization, transmit amounts payable to a claimant or to the account of such person in a bank or other financial institution regulated by state or federal authority.

[ 2011 c 346 s 202.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.